Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1412
Cooperative; use of term restricted.

No association, corporation, or organization shall use the term cooperative as a part of its name unless it is in fact operating on a cooperative basis.

Laws 1925, c. 80, § 12, p. 253;

C.S.1929, § 24-1412;

R.S.1943, § 21-1412.